California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(B) The homeowner has actually resided in the residence for the 12 months prior to completion of the work.

(C) The homeowner has not availed himself or herself of the exemption in this paragraph on more than two structures more than once during any three-year period.

(4) A nonprofit corporation providing assistance to an owner-builder, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 50692 of the Health and Safety Code, who is participating in a mutual self-help housing program, as defined in Section 50078 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) In all actions brought under this chapter, both of the following shall apply:

(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), proof of the sale or offering for sale of a structure by or for the owner-builder within one year after completion of the structure constitutes a rebuttable presumption affecting the burden of proof that the structure was undertaken for purposes of sale.

(2) Proof of the sale or offering for sale of five or more structures by the owner-builder within one year after completion constitutes a conclusive presumption that the structures were undertaken for purposes of sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 714, Sec. 1.   (SB 944)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7044.01.

In addition to all other remedies, any licensed contractor or association of contractors, labor organization, consumer affected by the violation, district attorney, or the Attorney General shall be entitled to seek injunctive relief prohibiting any violation of this chapter by an owner-builder who is neither licensed nor exempted from licensure under this chapter. The plaintiff in that action shall not be required to prove irreparable injury and shall be entitled to attorney’s fees and all costs incurred in the prosecution of the action, provided the plaintiff is the prevailing party. The defendant in that action shall be entitled to attorney’s fees and all costs incurred in the defense against the action, provided the defendant is the prevailing party.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 307, Sec. 71.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

7044.1.

This chapter does not apply to a real estate licensee acting within the course and scope of his or her license pursuant to the Real Estate Law (Part 1 (commencing with Section 10000) of Division 4). However, nothing in this section shall authorize a real estate licensee or a property manager to act in the capacity of a contractor unless licensed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 361, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7044.2.

This chapter does not apply to an admitted surety insurer whenever that surety insurer engages a contractor to undertake the completion of a contract on which a performance or completion bond was issued by the surety insurer, provided all actual construction work is performed by duly licensed contractors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 17, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

7045.

This chapter does not apply to the sale or installation of any finished products, materials, or articles of merchandise that do not become a fixed part of the structure, nor shall it apply to a material supplier or manufacturer furnishing finished products, materials, or articles of merchandise who does not install or contract for the installation of those items. The term “finished products” shall not include installed carpets or mobilehomes or mobilehome accessory structures, as defined in Section 7026.2.

This chapter shall apply to the installation of home improvement goods, as defined in Section 7151.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 589, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7046.

This chapter does not apply to any construction, alteration, improvement, or repair of personal property. The term “personal property” shall not include mobilehomes or mobilehome accessory structures as defined in Section 7026.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1160, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

7048.

(a) This chapter does not apply to a work or operation on one undertaking or project by one or more contracts if the aggregate contract price for labor, materials, and all other items is less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), that work or operation being considered of casual, minor, or inconsequential nature, and the work or operation does not require a building permit.

(b) This section does not apply in a case wherein the work of construction is only a part of a larger or major operation, whether undertaken by the same or a different contractor, or in which a division of the operation is made in contracts of amounts less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for the purpose of evasion of this chapter or otherwise.

(c) This section does not apply to a person who does either of the following:

(1) Advertises or puts out a sign or card or other device that might indicate to the public that the person is a contractor or that the person is qualified to engage in the business of a contractor.

(2) Employs another person to perform, or assist in performing, the work or operation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 12.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7049.

This chapter does not apply to any construction or operation incidental to the construction and repair of irrigation and drainage ditches of regularly constituted irrigation districts, reclamation districts, or to farming, dairying, agriculture, viticulture, horticulture, or stock or poultry raising, or clearing or other work upon the land in rural districts for fire prevention purposes, except when performed by a licensee under this chapter.

The provisions of this chapter do apply to the business of drilling digging, boring, or otherwise constructing, deepening, repairing, reperforating, or abandoning water wells.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1691.)
-------------------------------------------

7050.

(a) This chapter does not apply to an artist who draws, paints, applies, executes, restores, or conserves a mural pursuant to an agreement with a person who could legally authorize the work.

(b) For purposes of this section, ”mural” means a unique work of fine art that is protected by copyright, trademark, label, or patent and that is drawn or painted by hand directly onto interior or exterior walls or ceilings, fixtures, or other appurtenances of a building or structure. “Mural” does not include painted wall signs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 758, Sec. 1.   (SB 456)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7051.

This chapter does not apply to a licensed architect or a registered civil or professional engineer acting solely in his or her professional capacity or to a licensed structural pest control operator acting within the scope of his or her license or a licensee operating within the scope of the Geologist and Geophysicist Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 26, Sec. 206.   Effective March 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7052.

This chapter does not apply to any person who only furnishes materials or supplies without fabricating them into, or consuming them in the performance of, the work of the contractor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

7053.

Except as provided in Article 10 (commencing with Section 7150), this chapter does not apply to any person who engages in the activities herein regulated as an employee who receives wages as his or her sole compensation, does not customarily engage in an independently established business, and does not have the right to control or discretion as to the manner of performance so as to determine the final results of the work performed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1427, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7054.

This chapter does not apply to any person who performs work in the installation, maintenance, monitoring, selling, alteration, or servicing of alarm systems, as defined in Section 7590.1, and who holds an alarm company operator’s license issued pursuant to Chapter 11.6 (commencing with Section 7590).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 406, Sec. 2.   (SB 904)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7054.5.

The licensing provisions of this chapter do not apply to any person registered under Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 9800) if that person’s activities consist only of installing satellite antenna systems on residential structures or property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 422, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Classifications [7055. - 7059.1.]

7055.

For the purpose of classification, the contracting business includes any or all of the following branches:

(a) General engineering contracting.

(b) (1) General building contracting.

(2) Residential remodeling contracting.

(c) Specialty contracting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 364, Sec. 2.   (SB 1189)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7056.

A general engineering contractor is a contractor whose principal contracting business is in connection with fixed works requiring specialized engineering knowledge and skill, including the following divisions or subjects: irrigation, drainage, water power, water supply, flood control, inland waterways, harbors, docks and wharves, shipyards and ports, dams and hydroelectric projects, levees, river control and reclamation works, railroads, highways, streets and roads, tunnels, airports and airways, sewers and sewage disposal plants and systems, waste reduction plants, bridges, overpasses, underpasses and other similar works, pipelines and other systems for the transmission of petroleum and other liquid or gaseous substances, parks, playgrounds and other recreational
 works, refineries, chemical plants and similar industrial plants requiring specialized engineering knowledge and skill, powerhouses, powerplants and other utility plants and installations, mines and metallurgical plants, land leveling and earthmoving projects, excavating, grading, trenching, paving and surfacing work and cement and concrete works in connection with the above-mentioned fixed works.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 12.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

7057.

(a) Except as provided in this section, a general building contractor is a contractor whose principal contracting business is in connection with any structure built, being built, or to be built, for the support, shelter, and enclosure of persons, animals, chattels, or movable property of any kind, requiring in its construction the use of at least two unrelated building trades or crafts, or to do or superintend the whole or any part thereof.

This does not include anyone who merely furnishes materials or supplies under Section 7045 without fabricating them into, or consuming them in the performance of, the work of the general building contractor.

(b) A general building contractor may take a prime contract or a subcontract for a framing or carpentry project. However, a general building contractor shall not take a prime contract for any project involving trades other than framing or carpentry unless the prime contract requires at least two unrelated building trades or crafts other than framing or carpentry, or unless the general building contractor holds the appropriate license classification or subcontracts with an appropriately licensed contractor to perform the work. A general building contractor shall not take a subcontract involving trades other than framing or carpentry, unless the subcontract requires at least two unrelated trades or crafts other than framing or carpentry, or unless the general building contractor holds the appropriate license classification. The general building contractor
 shall not count framing or carpentry in calculating the two unrelated trades necessary in order for the general building contractor to be able to take a prime contract or subcontract for a project involving other trades.

(c) A general building contractor shall not contract for any project that includes a fire protection system as provided for in Section 7026.12 or 7026.13, or the “C-57” Well Drilling classification as provided for in Section 13750.5 of the Water Code, unless the general building contractor holds the appropriate license classification, or subcontracts with the appropriately licensed contractor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 377, Sec. 3.   (AB 433)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

7057.5.

(a) A residential remodeling contractor is a contractor whose principal contracting business is in connection with any project to make improvements to, on, or in an existing residential wood frame structure, and the project requires the use of at least three unrelated building trades or crafts for a single contract. 

(b) (1) A residential remodeling contractor may take a prime contract for trades or crafts which may include, but is not limited to, the following: 

(A) Drywall.

(B) Finish carpentry.

(C) Flooring.

(D) Insulation.

(E) Painting.

(F) Plastering.

(G) Roof repair.

(H) Siding.

(I) Tiling.

(J) Installing, repairing, or replacing electrical fixtures, such as dimmers, fans, lights, outlets, and switches.

(K) Installing, repairing, or replacing plumbing fixtures, such as faucets, sinks, toilets, and tubs.

(L) Installing, repairing, or replacing mechanical fixtures, such as air filters, air delivery and return grills, and preassembled exhaust fans.

(2) A residential remodeling contractor shall not take a contract unless the contract includes three or more unrelated trades or crafts.

(3) Subject to the limit described in paragraph (2), a residential remodeling contractor may self-perform its contract or may subcontract any of the trades or crafts to appropriately licensed subcontractor or subcontractors. 

(c) A residential remodeling contractor shall conduct its contracting activity in accordance with the following restrictions: 

(1) A residential remodeling contractor shall not contract for a project that includes the following trades or crafts unless the contractor holds the appropriate license classification or subcontracts with an appropriately licensed contractor: 

(A) C-16 Fire Protection.

(B) C-22 Asbestos Abatement.

(C) C-57 Well Drilling.

(2) A residential remodeling contractor shall not contract to make structural changes to load bearing portions of an existing structure, including, but not limited to, footings, foundations, load bearing walls, partitions, and roof structures. 

(3) (A) The residential remodeling contractor shall not contract to install, replace, substantially alter, or extend electrical, mechanical, or plumbing systems or their component parts, or the mechanisms or devices that are part of those systems, unless the residential remodeling contractor holds the appropriate license classification or subcontracts with an appropriately licensed contractor.

(B) The residential remodeling contractor may contract to make minor alterations to existing electrical, mechanical, or plumbing systems to effectuate the purpose of installing, repairing, or replacing electrical, mechanical and plumbing
 fixtures, provided that the contract requires the use of at least three unrelated building trades or crafts.

(C) The board may adopt regulations to further define what activity constitutes the minor alterations described in subparagraph (B), and to further define the electrical, mechanical, or plumbing systems, or their component parts, or the mechanisms or devices that are part of those systems, that are subject to the restriction described in subparagraph (A). 

(d) This contractor classification may be cited as the B-2 Residential Remodeling Contractor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 364, Sec. 3.   (SB 1189)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7058.

(a) A specialty contractor is a contractor whose operations involve the performance of construction work requiring special skill and whose principal contracting business involves the use of specialized building trades or crafts.

(b) A specialty contractor includes a contractor whose operations include the business of servicing or testing fire extinguishing systems.

(c) A specialty contractor includes a contractor whose operations are concerned with the installation and laying of carpets, linoleum, and resilient floor covering.

(d) A specialty contractor includes a contractor whose operations are concerned with preparing or removing roadway construction zones, lane closures, flagging, or traffic diversions on roadways, including, but not limited to, public streets, highways, or any public conveyance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 354, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

7058.5.

(a) A contractor shall not engage in asbestos-related work, as defined in Section 6501.8 of the Labor Code, that involves 100 square feet or more of surface area of asbestos containing materials, unless the contractor holds a C-22 Asbestos Abatement classification or the qualifier for the license passes an asbestos certification examination. Additional updated asbestos certification examinations may be required based on new health and safety information. The decision on whether to require an updated certification examination shall be made by the Contractors State License Board, in consultation with the Division of Occupational Safety and Health in the Department of Industrial Relations and the Division of Environmental and Occupational
 Disease Control in the State Department of Public Health.

No asbestos certification examination shall be required for contractors involved with the installation, maintenance, and repair of asbestos cement pipe or sheets, vinyl asbestos floor materials, or asbestos bituminous or resinous materials.

“Asbestos,” as used in this section, has the same meaning as defined in Section 6501.7 of the Labor Code.

(b) The Contractors State License Board shall make available to all applicants, either on the board’s internet website or, if requested, in hard copy, a booklet containing information relative to handling and disposal of asbestos, together with an open book examination concerning asbestos-related work. All applicants for an initial contractor license shall complete
 the open book examination and, prior to the issuance of a contractor’s license, submit it to the board electronically or by mail if the applicant elects to use the hard-copy format.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (SB 826)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7058.6.

(a) The board shall not issue an asbestos certification, as required by Section 7058.5, unless the contractor is registered with the Division of Occupational Safety and Health of the Department of Industrial Relations pursuant to Section 6501.5 of the Labor Code. The board may issue an asbestos certification to a contractor who is not registered, provided the contractor in a written statement acknowledges that they do not perform asbestos-related work. The board shall notify both the division and the contractor, in writing, of the contractor’s passage of the certification examination, for the purpose of allowing the contractor to satisfy the requirement of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 6501.5 of the Labor Code. The contractor
 shall register with the division within 90 days from the date the contractor is notified of the passage of the certification examination. The board may require a reexamination if the contractor fails to register within 90 days following issuance of the notification. Applicable test fees shall be paid for any reexamination required under this section.

(b) Any contractor who is certified to engage in asbestos-related work shall present proof of current registration with the division pursuant to Section 6501.5 of the Labor Code upon application for renewal of the contractor’s license, if the contractor engages in asbestos-related work, as defined in Section 6501.8 of the Labor Code.

(c) A contractor who is not certified pursuant to this section may bid on and contract to perform
 a project involving asbestos-related work as long as the asbestos-related work is performed by a contractor who holds the C-22 Asbestos Abatement classification or is certified and registered pursuant to this section and Section 6501.5 of the Labor Code.

(d) The board shall obtain and periodically update the list of contractors certified to engage in asbestos-related work who are registered pursuant to Section 6501.5 of the Labor Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 188, Sec. 9.   (SB 826)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7058.7.

(a) No contractor may engage in a removal or remedial action, as defined in subdivision (d), unless the qualifier for the license has passed an approved hazardous substance certification examination.

(b) (1) The Contractors State License Board, the Division of Occupational Safety and Health of the Department of Industrial Relations, and the Department of Toxic Substances Control shall jointly select an advisory committee, which shall be composed of two representatives of hazardous substance removal workers in California, two general engineering contractors in California, and two representatives of insurance companies in California who shall be selected by the Insurance Commissioner.

(2) The Contractors State License Board shall develop a written test for the certification of contractors engaged in hazardous substance removal or remedial action, in consultation with the Division of Occupational Safety and Health, the State Water Resources Control Board, the Department of Toxic Substances Control, and the advisory committee.

(c) The Contractors State License Board may require additional updated approved hazardous substance certification examinations of licensees currently certified based on new public or occupational health and safety information. The Contractors State License Board, in consultation with the Department of Toxic Substances Control and the State Water Resources Control Board, shall approve other initial and updated hazardous substance certification examinations and determine whether to require an updated certification examination of all current certificate holders.

(d) For purposes of this section “removal or remedial action” has the same meaning as found in Part 2 (commencing with Section 78000) of Division 45 of the Health and Safety Code, if the action requires the contractor to dig into the surface of the earth and remove the dug material and the action is at a site listed pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 78760) of Chapter 4 of Part 2 of Division 45 of the Health and Safety Code or any other site listed as a hazardous substance release site by the Department of Toxic Substances Control or a site listed on the National Priorities List compiled pursuant to the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 9601 et seq.). “Removal or remedial action” does not include asbestos-related work, as defined in Section 6501.8 of the Labor Code, or work related to a hazardous substance spill on a highway.

(e) (1) A contractor may not install or remove an underground storage tank, unless the contractor has passed the hazardous substance certification examination developed pursuant to this section.

(2) A contractor who is not certified may bid on or contract for the installation or removal of an underground tank, if the work is performed by a contractor who is certified pursuant to this section.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “underground storage tank” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (y) of Section 25281 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 258, Sec. 1.   (AB 2327)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 130 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 258.)
-------------------------------------------

7058.8.

The board shall make available to the public upon request information about contracting for the removal or encapsulation of asbestos-containing materials in a building including all of the following:

(a) Steps to take when contracting with a company to remove asbestos.

(b) Existing laws and regulations pertaining to asbestos-related work in California.

(c) Basic health information as contained in the United States Environmental Protection Agency publication, “Guidance for Controlling Asbestos-Containing Materials in Buildings.”

(d) A current list of contractors who are certified pursuant to Section 7058.5 to engage in asbestos-related work and who are registered pursuant to Section 6501.5 of the Labor Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 432, Sec. 12.   (SB 944)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

7059.

(a) The board may adopt reasonably necessary rules and regulations to effect the classification of contractors in a manner consistent with established usage and procedure as found in the construction business, and may limit the field and scope of the operations of a licensed contractor to those in which they are classified and qualified to engage, as defined by Sections 7055, 7056, 7057, and 7058. A licensee may make application for classification and be classified in more than one classification if the licensee meets the qualifications prescribed by the board for such additional classification or classifications. The application shall be in a form as prescribed by the registrar and shall be accompanied by the application fee fixed by this chapter. No license fee shall be charged for an
 additional classification or classifications.

Nothing contained in this section shall prohibit a specialty contractor from taking and executing a contract involving the use of two or more crafts or trades, if the performance of the work in the crafts or trades, other than in which they are licensed, is incidental and supplemental to the performance of the work in the craft for which the specialty contractor is licensed.

(b) (1) In public works contracts, as defined in Section 1101 of the Public Contract Code, the awarding authority shall determine the license classification necessary to bid and perform the project, in accordance with the classifications prescribed by this article and as set forth in Division 8 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations. In no case shall the awarding authority award a prime contract to a specialty contractor whose classification constitutes
 less than a majority of the project. When a specialty contractor is authorized to bid a project, all work to be performed outside of their license specialty, except work authorized by subdivision (a), shall be performed by a licensed subcontractor in compliance with the Subletting and Subcontracting Fair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code).

(2) Nothing contained in this subdivision shall be construed as authorizing an awarding authority to enact regulations relating to the qualifications necessary to engage in the business of contracting.

(3) Nothing contained in this subdivision shall deprive the registrar of the authority to investigate complaints and commence disciplinary proceedings for violations of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 485, Sec. 6.   (SB 1455)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7059.1.

(a) A licensee shall not use any business name that indicates the licensee is qualified to perform work in classifications other than those issued for that license, or any business name that is incompatible with the type of business entity licensed.

(b) A licensee shall not conduct business under more than one name for each license. Nothing in this section shall prevent a licensee from obtaining a business name change as otherwise provided by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 728, Sec. 57.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Licensing [7065. - 7077.]

7065.

(a) Under rules and regulations adopted by the board and approved by the director, the registrar shall investigate, classify, and qualify applicants for contractors’ licenses by written examination. This examination shall include questions designed to show that the applicant has the necessary degree of knowledge required by Section 7068 and shall include pertinent questions relating to the laws of this state and the contracting business and trade.

(b) (1) Contractors’ licenses are to be issued to individual owners, partnerships, corporations, limited liability companies, and participating tribes, in accordance with this chapter.

(A) Every person who is an officer, member,
 responsible manager, or director of a corporation or limited liability company seeking licensure under this chapter shall be listed on the application as a member of the personnel of record.

(B) Every person who is a member of a partnership seeking licensure under this chapter shall be listed on the application as a member of the personnel record.

(2) A corporation or limited liability company, whether foreign or domestic, seeking licensure under this chapter shall provide its identification number issued by the Secretary of State.

(3) A tribal business, including a corporation organized or chartered by a federally recognized tribe pursuant to tribally enacted laws or to Section 17 of the federal Act of June 18, 1934, popularly known as the “Indian Reorganization Act,” shall provide verification of its status as a
 tribal business. Verification may include, but is not limited to, the following:

(A) Enacted resolution ratifying the charter pursuant to Section 17 of the Indian Reorganization Act.

(B) Enacted resolution authorizing the tribally chartered corporation under tribally enacted laws.

(C) Articles of incorporation or by-laws.

(D) A current list of federally recognized tribes or directory of tribal leadership published under the Federally Recognized Indian Tribe List Act of 1994 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 5131) or on the internet website of the United States Bureau of Indian Affairs.

(c) An applicant shall qualify for licensure in accordance with this subdivision as follows:

(1) An individual owner may qualify by examination for a contractor’s license upon the appearance of the owner or a qualifying individual appearing as a responsible managing employee on behalf of the owner.

(2) A partnership may qualify by examination for a contractor’s license upon the appearance of a partner or a qualifying individual appearing as a responsible managing employee on behalf of the partnership.

(3) A corporation or participating tribe may qualify by examination for a contractor’s license upon the appearance of a qualifying individual appearing either as a responsible managing officer or a responsible managing employee on behalf of the corporation.

(4) A limited liability company may qualify by examination for a contractor’s license upon the
 appearance of a qualifying individual appearing as a responsible managing officer, a responsible managing manager, a responsible managing member, or a responsible managing employee on behalf of the company.

(d) No examination shall be required of a qualifying individual if, within the five-year period immediately preceding the application for licensure, the qualifying individual has either personally passed the written examination for the same classification being applied for, or has served as the qualifying individual for a licensee whose license was in good standing at any time during the five-year period immediately preceding the application for licensure and in the same classification being applied for.

(e) The registrar may contract with a public or private organization to conduct or administer the examination. The registrar may also contract with a public or private
 organization for materials or services related to the examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 485, Sec. 7.   (SB 1455)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7065.01.

Notwithstanding Section 7065, no trade examination shall be required of an applicant for the limited specialty license classification.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 311, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7065.05.

The board shall periodically review and, if needed, revise the contents of qualifying examinations to insure that the examination questions are timely and relevant to the business of contracting. The board shall, in addition, construct and conduct examinations in such a manner as to preclude the possibility of any applicant having prior knowledge of any specific examination question.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 280, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

7065.06.

(a) Before the board revises the examination for a landscaping contractor (C-27), the board shall confer with the Department of Water Resources and the California Landscape Contractors Association to determine whether any updates or revisions to the examination are needed to reflect new and emerging landscape irrigation efficiency practices.

(b) The board shall ensure that the examination includes questions that are specific to water use efficiency and sustainable practices to help ensure that the state’s water efficiency needs identified in the California Water Plan, described in Section 10004 of the Water Code, are sufficiently supported.

(c) The board shall ensure that the
 reference study material for the examination continues to include the most current version of the Model Water Efficient Landscape Ordinance (23 Cal. Code Regs. 490, et seq.) and shall add other collateral material specific to water use efficiency and sustainability.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 867, Sec. 2.   (AB 2371)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7065.1.

Notwithstanding Section 7065, the registrar may waive the examination for a contractor’s license under any of the following circumstances:

(a) The qualifying individual has, for five of the seven years immediately preceding the application for licensure, been listed on the official records of the board as a member of the personnel of any licensee who held a license, which was active and in good standing, in the same classification being applied for, and who during the period listed on the license has been actively engaged in a licensee’s construction activities in the same classification within which the applicant applies for a license.

(b) The qualifying individual is an immediate member of the family of a licensee whose individual license was active and in good standing for five of the seven years immediately preceding the application for licensure, and the qualifying individual is able to show all of the following:

(1) The qualifying individual has been actively engaged in the licensee’s business for five of the seven years immediately preceding the application for licensure.

(2) The license is required to continue the existing family business in the event of the absence or death of the licensee.

(3) An application is made for a new license in the same classifications in which the licensee is or was licensed.

(c) The qualifying individual is an employee of a corporation
 or a limited liability company seeking to replace its former qualifying individual and has been employed by that corporation or limited liability company under the following conditions:

(1) For five of the seven years immediately preceding the application for licensure, the qualifying individual has been continually employed by the corporation or limited liability company in a supervisory capacity in the same classifications being applied for.

(2) For five of the seven years immediately preceding the application for licensure, the corporation or limited liability company has held an active license in good standing in the same classifications being applied for.

(3) The corporation or limited liability company has not requested a waiver under this subdivision within the past five years.

For purposes of this section, employees of a corporation or limited liability company shall include, but not be limited to, the officers of a corporation and the officers and managers of a limited liability company.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 698, Sec. 6.   (SB 392)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

7065.2.

Notwithstanding Section 7065, the registrar may waive the examination for a contractor’s license if the applicant has previously held a valid contractor’s license in this state and has been acting in the capacity of a contractor for the United States government in a position exempt from licensure under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 630, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7065.3.

Notwithstanding Section 7065, upon a conclusive showing by a licensee that he or she possesses experience satisfactory to the registrar in the classification applied for, an additional classification may be added, without further examination, under all of the following conditions:

(a) For five of the seven years immediately preceding the application, the qualifying individual of the licensee has been listed as a member of the personnel of any licensee whose license was active and in good standing, and who during the period listed on a license was actively engaged in the licensee’s construction activities.

(b) The qualifying individual for the applicant has had within the last 10 years immediately preceding the filing of the application, not less than four years experience as a journeyman, foreman, supervising employee, or contractor in the classification within which the licensee intends to engage in the additional classification as a contractor.

(c) The application is, as determined by the registrar, for a classification that is closely related to the classification or classifications in which the licensee is licensed, or the qualifying individual is associated with a licensed general engineering contractor or licensed general building contractor and is applying for a classification that is a significant component of the licensed contractor’s construction business as determined by the registrar. This section shall not apply to an
 applicant who is licensed solely within the limited-specialty classifications.

Pursuant to Section 7065, the registrar shall conduct a comprehensive investigation of no less than 3 percent of applications filed under this section to ensure that the applicants met the experience requirements of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 319, Sec. 7.   (SB 822)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

7065.4.
